Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Housing and Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Housing Stabilization
Programs .................................. $439,895,108
(2) Project-Based Rental
Housing Assistance ................... $ 31,277,799
(3) Multifamily Rental
Housing Programs .................... $ 3,015,367
(4) Single Family Housing
Programs .................................. $ 6,358,507
(5) Disaster Recovery and
Resilience.................................. $ 1,058,493
(6) Central Services ........................ $ 10,749,055
(7) Debt Service for Bond
Related Activities ...................... $231,210,299
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds from the United  States Department of Housing and Urban Development for con-
tract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in this  section,
collected or  received by the Housing and Community Services Department, for the following
purposes:
(1) Housing Stabilization
Programs .................................. $226,785,240
(2) Project-Based Rental
Housing Assistance ................... $ 8,642,988
(3) Multifamily Rental
Housing Programs .................... $331,256,659
(4) Single Family Housing
Enrolled House Bill 5011 (HB 5011-A) Page 1
Programs .................................. $ 26,934,194
(5) Disaster Recovery and
Resilience.................................. $ 8,000,000
(6) Central Services ........................ $ 46,176,352
(7) Bond Activities ......................... $ 6,721,380
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$40,500,992 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Housing and Community Services Department for  debt ser-
vice for bond-related activities.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described in section 2 of this 2025  Act col-
lected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Housing Stabilization
Programs ..................................  $ 115,993,766
(2) Project-Based Rental
Housing Assistance ...................  $ 1,026,882
(3) Multifamily Rental
Housing Programs ....................  $ 46,466,360
(4) Single Family Housing
Programs .................................. $ 12,165,154
(5) Disaster Recovery and
Resilience.................................. $167,383,063
(6) Central Services ........................ $ 6,196,466
SECTION 5. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2025, expenditures by the Housing and
Community Services Department for the following are not limited:
(1) Payments for costs resulting from the sale and issuance or redemption of  bonds is-
sued under ORS 287A.360, 456.519, 456.645 and 456.650 (2005 Edition).
(2) Payment of debt service  and redemption premium on bonds issued under ORS
287A.360, 456.519, 456.645 and 456.650  (2005 Edition) and payments for the purchase of bonds
as provided in ORS 456.680.
(3) Loans and payments for purchasing, insuring and servicing loans  as provided in ORS
456.625, 456.627, 456.635, 456.690, 456.705, 456.715  and 456.717 and payments for the purchase
from lending institutions of securities backed  by residential loans as provided in ORS 456.635
(1).
(4) Advances for development costs made in accordance with ORS 456.710.
(5) Pass-through payments of federal rent subsidy moneys from the United  States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development.
(6) Payments for costs associated with asset protection.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community  Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for Multifamily Rental Housing
Programs, for deposit into the  General Housing Account created under ORS 458.620, to be
expended for community housing supporting agricultural employees.
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community  Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $3,900,000, for Single Family Housing Pro-
grams, for deposit into the  Housing Finance Fund established under ORS 456.720, to be ex-
pended for down payment assistance.
Enrolled House Bill 5011 (HB 5011-A) Page 2
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community  Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, for Single Family Housing Pro-
grams, for  deposit into the Manufactured Home Preservation Fund established under ORS
458.366, to be expended for manufactured home repair and replacement.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5011 (HB 5011-A) Page 3